Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,186
State Board of Landscape Architects; members; appointment; qualifications; terms; removal.

(1) There is hereby created a State Board of Landscape Architects consisting of six members who shall be appointed by the Governor. Five members of the board shall be professional landscape architects and one shall be a member of the public.

(2) Each member shall be a citizen of the United States and shall have been a resident of the State of Nebraska for at least one year immediately preceding appointment.

(3) Each professional landscape architect member shall have been engaged in the active practice of landscape architecture for at least five years at the time of his or her appointment and shall be a professional landscape architect in this state.

(4) The term of office of the members appointed to the board shall be for five years. A member shall hold office after the expiration of his or her term until his or her successor is duly appointed and qualified. Vacancies in the membership of the board, however created, shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the Governor. The Governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 3, p. 1861;

Laws 1971, LB 98, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB30, § 4.